Maryland, session 2026, HB0376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–125.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Bonus points” means established bonus or percentage points used
during the bid evaluation process to adjust the bid price submitted by minority business
enterprises for the purpose of ascertaining the lowest bidder.
(3) “Mandatory set–asides” means a procedure designating a certain
percentage of total contract dollars for award to minority business enterprises.
(4) “Mandatory subcontracting” means a procedure mandating that a
certain percentage of the dollar amount of designated contracts be subcontracted to
minority business enterprises.
(5) “Minority business enterprise” means any business enterprise:
(i) 1. That is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minority
individuals; or
2. In the case of any publicly owned corporation, at least 51
percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minority individuals; and
(ii) Whose management and daily business operations are controlled
by one or more minority individuals.
(6) “Percentage points” means established percentage points given for
minority business enterprise participation in a sealed proposal process.
(7) “Restrictive bidding” means competitive bidding of designated contracts
that are restricted to minority business enterprises.
(8) “Restrictive price quotations” means negotiated small procurements
that are restricted to minority business enterprises.
(b) The Board of Education of Prince George’s County shall undertake and
complete an internal and market fact–finding process by January 1, 1990, to assess the
appropriate scope of a minority business enterprise program for the board. The results of
the fact–finding process, including statistical data, supporting documentation, and reports,
shall be reported to the Prince George’s County Delegation of the General Assembly by
January 31, 1990.

HOUSE BILL 376 3
(c) (1) (I) If the fact–finding required by subsection (b) of this section
demonstrates a compelling governmental interest to adopt a remedial minority business
enterprise program, the county board, by resolution and by implementing rules and
regulations, shall establish a minority business enterprise program to facilitate the
participation of certified minority business enterprises in contracts awarded by the county
board.
(II) The program shall include specific goals and the definition of
“minority individual”.
(2) ANY PROGRAM ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 4–125.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(d) In establishing a minority business enterprise program, the county board is
authorized to use incentives to achieve the designated goals of the program, including but
not limited to:
(1) Mandatory set–aside procedures;
(2) Mandatory subcontracting procedures with reasonable waiver
provisions;
(3) The application of bonus points;
(4) The application of percentage points;
(5) Restrictive bidding;
(6) Restrictive price quotations;
(7) The reduction or waiver of bonding requirements; and
(8) Incentives to encourage maximum participation by:
(i) Small businesses;
(ii) A variety of different businesses; and
(iii) Businesses located within Prince George’s County.
(e) (1) The county board may appoint a minority business enterprise officer to
administer any minority business enterprise program established, who shall submit
reports to the board.

HOUSE BILL 376
(2) It is the responsibility of the minority business enterprise officer to
conduct outreach programs to assist the minority business enterprise community in
participating in any minority business enterprise program established under this section.
(f) The county board shall advise the Prince George’s County Delegation of the
General Assembly regarding the substance of any minority business enterprise program
that it establishes.
(g) (1) The program shall be evaluated every 2 years.
(2) The results of any evaluation under this subsection shall be submitted
to the Prince George’s County Delegation of the General Assembly.
4–125.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Certified county–based business participation” has the meaning stated
in § 10A–101 of the Code of Public Local Laws of Prince George’s County.
(3) “Certified county–based minority business participation” has the
meaning stated in § 10A–101 of the Code of Public Local Laws of Prince George’s County.
(4) “County–based business” has the meaning stated in § 10A–101 of the
Code of Public Local Laws of Prince George’s County.
(5) “County–based minority business enterprise” has the meaning stated
in § 10A–101 of the Code of Public Local Laws of Prince George’s County.
(6) “County–based small business” has the meaning stated in § 10A–101 of
the Code of Public Local Laws of Prince George’s County.
(7) “County board” means the Prince George’s County Board of Education.
(8) (i) “Procurement” means the process of buying, leasing,
lease–purchasing, or otherwise obtaining supplies, services, or construction.
(ii) “Procurement” includes all functions that relate to the process of
obtaining supplies, services, or construction, including:
1. Description of requirements;
2. Selection and solicitation of sources; and
3. Preparation, award, and execution of a contract.

HOUSE BILL 376 5
(9) “Program” means the Certified County–Based Business Participation
Program that may be established under this section.
(b) This section applies only in Prince George’s County.
(c) [The] SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 4–125.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE county board, after consultation with the County Superintendent, may establish and
implement a Certified County–Based Business Participation Program to be used in county
board procurement.
(d) If the county board exercises the authority granted in subsection (c) of this
section, the county board and the County Superintendent shall:
(1) Consult with the Prince George’s County Council, or its agencies or
agents, on the establishment and implementation of the Program; and
(2) Establish goals and requirements for the Program that may include:
(i) Minimum percentages for certified county–based business
participation;
(ii) Utilization of county–based small businesses;
(iii) Minimum goals and incentives for maximizing certified
county–based minority business participation; and
(iv) The goals established under § 4–125(d) of this subtitle.
(e) To achieve the designated goals of the Program, the county board and the
County Superintendent may use incentives and bonuses, including:
(1) Mandatory set–aside procedures;
(2) Mandatory subcontracting procedures with reasonable waiver
provisions;
(3) The application of bonus points;
(4) The application of percentage points;
(5) Restrictive bidding;
(6) Restrictive price quotations;
(7) The reduction or waiver of bonding requirements; and
(8) Incentives to encourage maximum participation by:

HOUSE BILL 376
(i) Certified county–based small businesses; and
(ii) A variety of different certified county–based businesses.
(f) If the county board exercises the authority granted in subsection (c) of this
section, the county board and the county council shall enter into a binding memorandum of
understanding outlining the county board’s goals and commitment to implementing the
Program.
(g) On or before December 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the county board,
after consultation with the County Superintendent, shall submit a report to the Prince
George’s County delegations to the House of Delegates and Senate of Maryland, the Prince
George’s County Council, and the Prince George’s County Executive, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, that specifies:
(1) The respective percentages and dollar amounts of certified
county–based business participation, certified county–based minority business
participation, and certified county–based small business participation in county board
procurement for the previous fiscal year; and
(2) The efforts by the county board and the County Superintendent in the
previous fiscal year to encourage greater certified county–based business participation,
certified county–based minority business participation, and certified county–based small
business participation in county board procurement.
4–125.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COUNTY–BASED BUSINESS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10A–101 OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(3) “COUNTY–BASED MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10A–101 OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(4) “COUNTY–BASED SMALL BUSINESS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 10A–101 OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(5) “COUNTY BOARD” MEANS THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION.

HOUSE BILL 376 7
(6) “COUNTY RESIDENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10A–101 OF
THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(7) “ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHOSE ABILITY TO COMPETE IN THE FREE ENTERPRISE SYSTEM HAS
BEEN IMPAIRED DUE TO DIMINISHED CAPITAL AND CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES AS
COMPARED TO OTHERS IN THE SAME OR SIMILAR LINE OF BUSINESS.
(8) “LOCALLY OWNED AND OPERATED BUSINESS” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 10–335 OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(9) “PARTICIPATION” MEANS THE PERCENTAGE OF TOTAL
CONTRACT OR PROCUREMENT DOLLARS PAID TO ONE OR MORE ENTITIES.
(10) “PROCUREMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–125.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY
ENACT A LOCAL LAW TO REGULATE THE PROCUREMENT ACTIVITIES OF THE PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM OR PRINCE GEORGE’S COMMUNITY
COLLEGE RELATED TO:
(I) PROCUREMENT PARTICIPATION REQUIREMENTS OR GOALS
FOR PRIME CONTRACTING AND SUBCONTRACTING FOR THE UTILIZATION OF
COUNTY–BASED BUSINESSES, COUNTY–BASED MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES,
COUNTY–BASED SMALL BUSINESSES, OR LOCALLY OWNED AND OPERATED
BUSINESSES;
(II) PROCUREMENT INCENTIVES FOR THE UTILIZATION OF
COUNTY–BASED BUSINESSES, COUNTY–BASED MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES,
COUNTY–BASED SMALL BUSINESSES, OR LOCALLY OWNED AND OPERATED
BUSINESSES, INCLUDING BID BONUSES, DISCOUNTS, AND INCENTIVE PAYMENTS;
(III) PROCUREMENT PERCENTAGE REQUIREMENTS OR GOALS
FOR WORK HOURS TO BE WORKED BY COUNTY RESIDENTS OR ECONOMICALLY
DISADVANTAGED INDIVIDUALS; AND
(IV) WAIVERS AND EXCEPTIONS TO THE REQUIREMENTS
ENACTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 376
(2) THE COUNTY BOARD AND THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY COLLEGE
TRUSTEES FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL COMPLY WITH ANY LOCAL LAWS
ENACTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
16–311.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this section
applies to every contract for any building, improvement, equipment, or supplies.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(i) The purchase of books or other materials for instruction;
(ii) Emergency repairs;
(iii) Any contract or purchase made by a county for a community
college under procedures authorized by the county charter or an act of the General
Assembly; or
(iv) Any contract or purchase that qualifies as a “small procurement”
as defined in the State Procurement Regulations.
(b) At the discretion of the procurement officer, the following procurement
methods are authorized where applicable:
(1) Competitive sealed bids under subsection (c) of this section;
(2) Competitive sealed proposals under § 16–313 of this subtitle;
(3) Sole source procurement under § 16–314 of this subtitle; or
(4) Noncompetitive negotiation under § 16–314.1 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) The board of trustees may provide for procurement by competitive
sealed bids in accordance with this subsection.
(2) (i) Whenever procurement is based on competitive sealed bids, the
board of trustees, or its designee, shall seek bids by issuing an invitation for bids.
(ii) The board of trustees, at least 2 weeks before bids are to be filed,
shall advertise for bids in at least one newspaper published in the county or in eMaryland
Marketplace, in accordance with Title 17, Subtitle 5 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.

HOUSE BILL 376 9
(iii) The board of trustees may name in the specifications and
advertisements for bids the particular make, kind, or brand of article to be contracted for
or purchased.
(3) The board of trustees of each community college may provide for the
prequalification of persons as prospective responsible bidders for procurements other than
leases of real property.
(4) If a board of trustees uses a prequalification procedure for awarding a
procurement contract:
(i) A person who is not prequalified may submit a bid or proposal;
and
(ii) After bid opening or receipt of proposals and before awarding the
procurement contract, a procurement officer may determine that:
1. A person who was not prequalified at the time of bid
opening or receipt of proposals is a responsible bidder; or
2. A prequalified person is not a responsible bidder.
(5) Except as provided in paragraph (7) of this subsection, the contract
shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, who conforms to the specifications, with
consideration given to:
(i) The quantities involved;
(ii) The time required for delivery;
(iii) The purpose for which required;
(iv) The competence and responsibility of the bidder; and
(v) The ability of the bidder to perform the contract satisfactorily.
(6) The board of trustees may reject any and all bids and readvertise for
other bids.
(7) (i) In this paragraph, the term “minority business enterprise” has
the meaning stated in § 14–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) In Montgomery County, by resolution and by implementing rules
and regulations, the Board of Trustees of Montgomery Community College shall establish
a mandatory minority business utilization program to facilitate the participation of
responsible certified minority business enterprises in contracts awarded by the Board of

HOUSE BILL 376
Trustees of Montgomery Community College in accordance with competitive bidding
requirements.
(8) IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY
COLLEGE TRUSTEES FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH A PROGRAM
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–125.2 OF THIS ARTICLE TO FACILITATE THE
PARTICIPATION OF CERTAIN BUSINESS ENTERPRISES IN CONTRACTS AWARDED BY
THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEES FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMPETITIVE BIDDING REQUIREMENTS.
(d) A contract entered into or purchase made in violation of this section is void.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.